Hawaii statutes.
[§467E-1.5] Limitations of scope of
practice. In accordance with the definition of the practice of social
work, there shall be limitations on the scope of the practice of social work as
follows:

(1) The "licensed bachelor social
worker" or "L.B.S.W." may perform duties as defined in
paragraphs (1) to (4) of the definition of the practice of social work in
section 467E-1 in an agency setting under supervision;

(2) The "licensed social
worker" or "L.S.W." may perform duties as defined in paragraphs
(1) to (7) of the definition of the practice of social work in section 467E-1;
and

(3) The "licensed clinical social worker"
or "L.C.S.W." may perform duties as defined in paragraphs (1) to (8)
of the definition of the practice of social work in section 467E-1. [L 2002, c
167, §2]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next